Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB483.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111(i) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(i) Confidentiality.--All information provided by the potential purchaser, transferee or applicant, including, but not limited to, the potential purchaser, transferee or applicant's name or identity, furnished by a potential purchaser or transferee under this section or any applicant for a license to carry a firearm as provided by section 6109 shall be confidential and not subject to [public] disclosure[.] to an individual or entity, unless the potential purchaser, transferee or applicant is subject to criminal prosecution under subsection 123456789101112131415161718 (g) or a similar offense under Federal law and the information provided by the potential purchaser, transferee or applicant may be used as evidence in the criminal prosecution. In addition to any other sanction or penalty imposed by this chapter, any person, licensed dealer, State or local governmental agency or department that violates this subsection shall be liable in civil damages in the amount of $1,000 per occurrence or three times the actual damages incurred as a result of the violation, whichever is greater, as well as reasonable attorney fees.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0483PN0466 - 2 - 1234567891011